Rhode Island, session 2025, SB396.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 16 of the General Laws entitled "EDUCATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 117
RIGHTS OF PARENTS AND GUARDIANS IN PUBLIC EDUCATIONAL INSTRUCTION
ACT
16-117-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Rights of Parents and Guardians in
Public Educational Instruction Act."
16-117-2. Legislative purpose.
It is the purpose of this chapter to enable parents and guardians to have a voice in the
materials taught to their kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) children.
16-117-3. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings
unless the context shall clearly indicate another or different meaning or intent:
(1) "Lesson plan" means the daily, weekly, or other routinely produced guide, description
or outline of the instruction to be provided by a teacher to students at school.
(2) "Objects to any learning material or activity on the basis that the material or activity is
harmful" means objecting to the material or activity because of sexual content, violent content or

profane or vulgar language.
(3) "Procedures or processes" means procedures or processes that may vary by subject,
area or grade.
(4) "Public educational institution" means any of the following:
(i) A school district, including its schools; or
(ii) A charter school.
(5) "Used for student instruction" means:
(i) Assigned, distributed or otherwise presented to students in any course for which students
receive academic credit or in any educational capacity in which the school requires the student
body to participate or in which a majority of students, in a given grade level, participate; and
(ii) Includes learning materials or activities from which students are required to choose one
or more from a selection of materials that is restricted to specific titles.
16-117-4. Publication and posting by municipality.
(a) Every municipality shall publish or prominently place on the municipal website, at least
annually, a directory summarizing the subject matter of all currently applicable ordinances, codes
and substantive policy statements. The municipality shall keep copies of the directory and all
substantive policy statements at one location. The directory, ordinances, codes and substantive
policy statements and any materials incorporated by reference in the documents shall be open to
public inspection at the office of the municipality or posted on the municipal website.
(b) The municipality may post on its website links to the website of each school that posts
materials pursuant to this chapter and that is located within the municipality
16-117-5. Parents' and guardians' rights in educational materials.
(a) A parent or guardian of a student in a public educational institution has the right to
review learning materials and activities in advance. A parent or guardian who objects to any
learning material or activity on the basis that the material or activity is harmful may request to
withdraw their student from the activity or from the class or program in which the material is used
and request an alternative assignment.
(b) To ensure a parent's or guardian’s right to review learning materials and activities as
described in subsection (a) of this section, beginning in the 2025-2026 school year, each school
committee or school district governing board and charter school governing body shall ensure that
each school under its authority prominently discloses on a publicly accessible portion of its website
all of the following:
(1) The procedures or processes in effect at the school for a parent or guardian to access in
advance to review the current learning materials and activities used for student instruction at the
LC001967 - Page 2 of 7

school;
(2) The procedures or processes in effect for the school principal or other staff to document,
review or approve lesson plans or the learning materials and activities used for student instruction
or teacher training at the school and any change in those procedures or processes from the prior
year;
(3) A listing of the learning materials and activities used for instruction at the school in the
current year, including the following, organized, at a minimum, by subject area and grade:
(i) Textbooks, articles and other required reading materials;
(ii) Videos and audio recordings;
(iii) Digital materials;
(iv) Websites;
(v) Online applications for a phone, laptop or tablet;
(vi) Instructional handouts and worksheets;
(vii) Grade level or school wide assemblies;
(viii) Guest lecturers;
(ix) Action-oriented civics learning assignments or projects, including the contacting of
elected officials, advocating for or commenting on a political or social issue or participating in
political or social demonstrations;
(x) Service-learning, internships or other forms of collaboration with outside organizations
after regular school hours for course credit or as a class project or assignment; and
(xi) Other educational events facilitated by the school's staff, including those events
conducted by outside individuals or organizations;
(4) A listing of the teacher training materials and activities used at the school in the current
year;
(5) A listing of available resources in the school library at each school that maintains a
catalog or documented inventory of those resources; and
(6) A copy of each survey or the full text of any question included on a survey administered
at the school that solicits personal information about a student, and that requires the authorization
of the school district or charter school.
(c) The information required by this section shall be displayed online at least seven (7)
days before the start of each school year, if available, or, at the latest, three (3) calendar days before
the first use of each training or learning material or activity, survey or library resource in the current
year. Information posted pursuant to this section may be posted on an ongoing basis; provided that,
parents or guardians are notified of additions made during the school year at least three (3) calendar
LC001967 - Page 3 of 7

days before the first use of the material or activity. The listing of materials shall remain accessible
via the school website until at least the conclusion of the following school year.
(d) In preparing the listing of learning materials and activities, the school:
(1) Shall list the information necessary to identify the specific learning materials and
activities used for student instruction, including at least the title and the author, organization or
Internet address associated with each learning material and activity. A short description of the
learning material or activity may be included as necessary. This section does not require:
(i) The digital reproduction of the learning materials or activities;
(ii) The disclosure of academic assessments; or
(iii) The separate reporting of individual components of learning materials that are
produced as a single volume, except that for digital volumes containing works by multiple authors,
the school shall provide either a table of contents or Internet address that discloses the discrete
works and authors contained within the volume. Articles, videos or other materials from websites
shall be identified, if possible, with an Internet address specific to the relevant content used for
student instruction;
(2) May use collaborative online document or spreadsheet software that allows multiple
authorized users to update or make additions to posted content on an ongoing basis; provided that,
the information is publicly accessible via a posted link on the school website; and
(3) May satisfy the requirements of this section by posting a copy or the full text of the
lesson plans submitted to the school principal or other staff by instructors at the school in the current
year; provided that, any learning materials and activities not recorded on the lesson plans are also
listed via a publicly accessible portion of the school website.
16-117-6. Waiver.
(a) A charter school may require parents or guardians to waive the right to object to learning
materials or activities pursuant to this chapter as a condition of enrollment if the charter school
provides a complete list of books and materials to be used each school year before the student
enrolls. If the charter school introduces books or materials that were not disclosed prior to
enrollment, the parent or guardian retains the right to object to those materials pursuant to this
chapter.
(b) A charter school may require that any request to review learning materials or activities
or to withdraw the student from learning materials or activities pursuant to this chapter be made in
writing.
(c) A public educational institution shall obtain signed, written consent from a student's
parent or guardian before doing either of the following:
LC001967 - Page 4 of 7

(1) Using video, audio or electronic materials that may be inappropriate for the age of the
student; or
(2) Providing sex education instruction to the student. At the same time the public
educational institution seeks consent, it shall inform the student's parent or guardian of their right
to review the learning materials and activities.
(d) This section does not require a school to post or distribute a training or learning material
or activity in a manner that would constitute an infringement of copyright under the copyright act
(P. L. 94-553; 90 stat. 2541 to 2598; 17 USC §§ 101 to 1332).
16-117-7. Remedies.
(a) The parent or guardian may not initiate legal action to enforce this chapter unless the
party adheres to the following process:
(1) The party shall submit a complaint in writing with the specific facts of the alleged
violation to the principal of the school. The principal shall investigate the complaint and respond
in writing, including a description of any action taken to resolve the complaint, within fifteen (15)
days after receiving the written complaint.
(2) If the action taken by the principal of the school does not resolve the complaint, the
party shall submit a complaint in writing with the specific facts of the alleged violation to the school
district governing board or charter school governing body or the administrator designated by the
governing board or governing body. The school district governing board, charter school governing
body or designated administrator shall investigate the complaint and respond in writing, including
a description of any action taken to resolve the complaint, within twenty-five (25) days after
receiving the written complaint.
(3) If the action taken by the school district governing board, charter school governing
body or designated administrator does not resolve the complaint, the party may pursue legal action
to enforce this chapter.
(4) If a complaint is not resolved after pursing resolution pursuant to this section, the parent
or guardian may initiate a suit in superior court to bring action for injunctive relief to compel the
school district or charter school to bring the school into compliance with this chapter.
16-117-8. Liberal construction.
This chapter, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be
liberally construed in order to effectuate its purposes.
16-117-9. Severability.
If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this chapter shall be adjudged by any
court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, that judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate
LC001967 - Page 5 of 7

the remainder of the chapter but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph,
section, or part directly involved in the controversy in which that judgment shall have been
rendered.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001967
========
LC001967 - Page 6 of 7